Massachusetts, session 194th, H2229.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary, the Department
of Public Health and the Massachusetts Board of Registration in Medicine shall develop, or
provide for, a healthcare provider education campaign that encourages the adoption of all FDA-
approved medications for the treatment of alcohol and opioid use disorders. The goal of the
campaign is to increase the number of providers offering all FDA-approved medications, directly
or by referral, along with counseling and other appropriate support services. The training shall
include, but not be limited to guidelines and best practices for:
A. Screening and Assessment;
B. Toxicology screens;
of 3

C. Detoxification/withdrawal management and induction to relapse prevention
medication
D. Treatment Plans, including counseling frequency and type, and an informed consent
process to guide medication and treatment decisions and selection
E. Addressing Co-occurring mental health disorders
F. Reducing disparities in health outcomes for underserved communities experiencing
substance use disorder
G. Care Coordination;
H. Appropriate Length of Treatment; and
I. Relapse Prevention
The training developed or provided shall be accepted by the board as up to 2 continuing
professional development credits.
SECTION 2: Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary, the Department
of Public Health and the Bureau of Substance Abuse Services shall establish a peer mentoring
program that supplements the healthcare provider educational campaign by providing a network
for peer-to-peer trainings, materials, and prescriber and clinical team support. Peer mentors
should have strong credentials, expertise and clinical experience with all FDA-approved
medications for the treatment of substance use disorder. Mentors shall provide coaching for
providers licensed or certified by the Department of Public Health. The Department shall
prioritize the efforts of the peer mentor program for providers serving geographic areas and
racially and ethnically diverse populations of the Commonwealth identified by the Department
of 3

where access to medication assisted treatment is limited. Provided further, that said training
program shall include, but not be limited to the following criteria: patient eligibility, optimal
selection criteria, placement matching, patient engagement, team coaching and coordination,
withdrawal management and induction, dosing and administration, clinical evaluation and
laboratory monitoring, side effect management, co-occurring disorders management, drug-drug
interactions, treatment retention, managed care interactions, and termination of medication.
SECTION 3: There shall be a grant program established to support providers who
demonstrate the ability to offer all FDA-approved medications for substance use disorders, along
with counseling and other supports, directly or by referral. Providers will be eligible to apply for
funding to add a staff person(s) to support the expanded services. In addition to, or in substitution
of state funding, the grant program may utilize applicable federal grants and state trust funds.
SECTION 4: The department of public health shall create an inventory of health care
providers treating patients with medications to measure adoption of offering all FDA-approved
treatment options across the Commonwealth. They shall also submit a report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee on mental health and substance
use, and recovery on the number of providers trained and any identified obstacles to expanding
the number of providers offering all FDA-approved medications by January 1, 2020.
of 3